Washington statutes.
RCW 43.81.020

Availability of state-owned or leased living facilities.

(1) Whenever an agency requires that an employee reside in state-owned or leased living facilities as a condition of employment, such living facilities shall be made available to the employee under the conditions set forth in RCW 43.81.030 and 43.81.040.

(2) Whenever an agency determines that (a) a living facility owned or leased by the agency is not occupied by employees under subsection (1) of this section and (b) it would be to the agency's benefit to have the facility occupied by an employee of the agency whose duties involve extended personnel services associated with the worksite upon which the living facility is located or at worksite near to where the living facility is located, the agency may make the facility available to such employee.

(3) Whenever an agency determines that (a) a living facility owned or leased by the agency is not occupied by employees under subsection (1) of this section and (b) the facility has been made available to employees under subsection (2) of this section and that no such employees have opted to reside in the facility, the agency may make the facility available for occupancy to other interested parties.

[ 1985 c 463 s 2.]